Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6220
State agency, defined.

State agency shall include every state office, department, board, commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state and, when provided specifically by law to be a state agency for purposes of this section, programs and activities involving less than the full responsibility of a state agency.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 20;

Laws 1991, LB 81, § 5.